Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Department of Kentucky State Police
16.075.
Automobile liability insurance for State Police.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall secure, or reimburse members of the State Police who purchase a rider on their personal motor vehicle insurance policy to secure, such automobile liability insurance and uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage as will reasonably protect the interest of members of the State Police when in the conduct of official business.

Policies authorized by this section shall be purchased only in accordance with regulations prescribed by the commissioner of insurance and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The department shall determine the minimum coverage the member must purchase to be eligible for reimbursement under subsection (1) of this section and the maximum amount of reimbursement. The uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage shall be no less than the policy’s liability limits for bodily injury or death.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 193, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 2007, ch. 85, § 61, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 22, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

No provisions of the federal and Kentucky Constitutions are violated by a statute authorizing purchase of insurance for State Police and making an appropriation for this purpose.

OAG 63-881

.

16.080.
Administrative regulations governing officers and department — Bonds of employees — Oaths — Acquisition of real estate. [Effective until April 1, 2023]

The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations for the enlistment, training, code of ethics, discipline, and conduct of officers of the department and individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and the commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations for the governing and operation of the department as appear to him or her reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

16.010

to

16.170

.

The commissioner may require any officer, individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, or civilian who receives or disburses public funds in the course of his or her duties to file a bond, conditioned that he or she will honestly, correctly, and according to law, receive, disburse, and account for all public moneys coming into his or her hands. The commissioner, each officer, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, shall execute a bond to the Commonwealth of Kentucky in the sum of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000), conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his or her duties. The premium on the bonds shall be paid by the department. The commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall, before entering upon the discharge of their official duties, take the constitutional oath of office.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

56.440

to

56.550

, the commissioner, with the approval of the Governor and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may acquire real estate or interests therein, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, necessary for the purposes of the department, and, with like approval, provide for the acquisition or construction of necessary buildings and other permanent structures and facilities. Title to any real estate acquired shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 8; 1952, ch. 57, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 14; 1976, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 85, § 62, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 12, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 186, § 4, effective April 11, 2017.

16.080.
Administrative regulations governing officers and department — Bonds of employees — Oaths — Acquisition of real estate — Reduction of sick leave balances. [Effective April 1, 2023]

The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations for the enlistment, training, code of ethics, discipline, and conduct of officers of the department and individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and the commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations for the governing and operation of the department as appear to him or her reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

16.010

to

16.170

.

The commissioner may require any officer, individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, or civilian who receives or disburses public funds in the course of his or her duties to file a bond, conditioned that he or she will honestly, correctly, and according to law, receive, disburse, and account for all public moneys coming into his or her hands. The commissioner, each officer, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, shall execute a bond to the Commonwealth of Kentucky in the sum of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000), conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his or her duties. The premium on the bonds shall be paid by the department. The commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall, before entering upon the discharge of their official duties, take the constitutional oath of office.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

56.440

to

56.550

, the commissioner, with the approval of the Governor and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may acquire real estate or interests therein, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, necessary for the purposes of the department, and, with like approval, provide for the acquisition or construction of necessary buildings and other permanent structures and facilities. Title to any real estate acquired shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

16.583

and

16.584

, the commissioner shall direct the department to reduce sick leave balances of officers subject to the provisions of KRS

16.583

and

16.584

by the amount of sick leave credited to the hybrid cash balance plan for State Police Retirement System members under KRS 16.583 and 16.584.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 8; 1952, ch. 57, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 14; 1976, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 85, § 62, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 12, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 186, § 4, effective April 11, 2017; 2022 ch. 181, § 5, effective April 1, 2023.

16.090.
Training school.

The commissioner is authorized to organize and maintain a training school or schools for officers of the department, and in connection therewith to provide by administrative regulation the course and conduct of such training and the period of time for which any officer, or any applicant therefor, shall attend such school. The commissioner, under such administrative regulations as he or she may promulgate, is further authorized, but shall not be required, to make such training facilities available to any local governing unit within this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 2007, ch. 85, § 63, effective June 26, 2007.

16.095.
Officers required to take educational course on AIDS.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall require all officers employed by them to complete an educational course approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall develop literature on the human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and a training curriculum of not more than four (4) hours for the instruction of officers. The literature and training curriculum shall include information of known modes of transmission and methods of controlling and preventing these diseases with an emphasis on appropriate behavior and attitude change. This training may be part of any other training required and for which law enforcement officers receive an allowance to attend. However, nonreceipt of allowance does not exclude a law enforcement officer from the training required in this section.

All officers shall successfully complete the training required. Any person holding the position of officer shall not exercise that position for more than one (1) year without successfully completing the required training. If an officer does not successfully complete the required training within the time specified, he or she shall be suspended from further service as an officer until he or she successfully completes the required training.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 443, § 32, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 73, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 88, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 64, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Braden, Aids: Dealing With the Plague, 19 N. Ky. L. Rev. 277 (1992).

16.100.
Travel expenses and per diem allowances.

The commissioner may approve vouchers in payment of expenses, including travel, lodging and meals incurred by officers, individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and civilians of the department in the discharge of their duties, and such vouchers shall be audited and paid out of the department’s appropriation in the manner required by law.

The commissioner may, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, approve payment of a per diem allowance for officers of the department and individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, payable in a fixed sum for each day the officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class is on duty. The per diem allowance herein provided shall not be payable when the officer or the individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class is on travel status as provided by subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 10; 1970, ch. 287, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 13, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a police officer was temporarily suspended, he was not entitled to per diem for the period of the suspension.

OAG 71-379

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Expense accounts, regulation of, KRS

45.101

.

16.110.
Fees or rewards.

No fee for the performance of an act in line of duty, and no reward offered for the apprehension and conviction of any person or for the recovery of any property may be accepted by any officer, individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, or employee of the department, but any fee or reward to which such officer, individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, or civilian would be entitled, apart from the foregoing provision, shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a revolving fund, to be used by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 2009, ch. 59, § 8, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 14, effective June 25, 2013.

16.120.
Powers within cities. [Repealed.]

16.128.
The Department of Kentucky State Police is encouraged to receive training on issues pertaining to school and student safety, to meet with local superintendents, and to collaborate with local school districts on policies and procedures for communicating any instances of trauma-exposed students.

The Department of Kentucky State Police is encouraged to receive training on issues pertaining to school and student safety and shall be invited to meet annually with local superintendents to discuss emergency response plans and emergency response concerns.

The Department of Kentucky State Police is encouraged to collaborate with local school districts on policies and procedures for communicating to the school district any instances of trauma-exposed students.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 5, § 19, effective March 11, 2019; 2020 ch. 5, § 5, effective February 21, 2020.

16.130.
Cooperation with other agencies, local officers — Other states and federal government.

The commissioner shall cooperate and exchange information with any other department or agency of this Commonwealth, or with other police forces, both within and without this Commonwealth and with the federal government. The commissioner may, when authorized by the Governor, negotiate with the appropriate officials of other states in the preparation of interstate compacts for police protection as authorized by the Federal Congress, and such compacts as negotiated shall be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly for approval.

All peace officers of the various political subdivisions of this Commonwealth shall cooperate with the department and the commissioner, and all officers thereof in the enforcement of the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Owsley, The Kentucky Interlocal Cooperation Act, 51 Ky. L.J. 19 (1962).

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part IX, State Police, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

16.132.
Collection of statistical data concerning sexual offenses and sexual assault evidence kits — Tracking process for evidence kits — Public portal for victims to access the system.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall request from other law enforcement agencies, pursuant to KRS

17.150

, and shall collect statistical data regarding the reporting and investigation of any person charged with committing, attempting to commit, or complicity to a sexual offense as defined by KRS

510.040

,

510.050

,

510.060

,

510.070

,

510.080

,

510.090

,

510.110

,

510.120

,

510.130

,

510.140

,

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a), and

531.310

, and on the number of sexual assault evidence kits, as defined in KRS

216B.400

, which are submitted to law enforcement agencies, the number of such kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory, and the number of kits tested.

The information collected pursuant to this section for the previous calendar year shall be provided by May 1, 2018, and by each May 1 thereafter to the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS

403.707

.

The department shall by July 1, 2020, create and implement a tracking process for sexual assault forensic evidence kits. The department shall by December 1, 2020, promulgate administrative regulations governing the tracking process. The tracking process shall include, and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall require, a public portal allowing victims to access the system, and shall provide for the information to be submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 58, § 6, effective April 8, 2016; 2019 ch. 51, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was created in Section 6 of that Act.

16.140.
Discipline and removal of officers — Grounds and procedure — Removal of civilian employees — Probationary period.

With the exceptions specified in this section, KRS

16.150

,

16.160

, and

16.196

to

16.199

, no officer of the department shall be removed, suspended, reduced in grade or pay for any reason except inefficiency, misconduct, insubordination, or violation of law or of any administrative regulation promulgated by the commissioner. Any person may prefer charges in writing against any officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class, which shall be filed in the Office of Internal Affairs, which shall be designated by the commissioner as the recipient of charges and shall be administratively responsible for the maintenance of good order within the department through the collection and investigation of charges and the retention of their dispositions. The charges shall be signed by the person making the same, and shall set out with clarity and distinction each and every charge. The commissioner, whenever probable cause appears, shall prefer charges against any officer whom he believes to have been guilty of conduct justifying his removal or punishment, in the interest of public order. Within five (5) days after the filing of charges, the Office of Internal Affairs shall deliver a copy thereof, personally, by certified mail, return receipt requested to the officer offending. Within five (5) days after the receipt thereof, the officer may demand public hearing, or may admit the truth of the charges in whole or in part. If the officer admits the truthfulness of the charges, the commissioner shall remove, suspend, reduce in rank or pay the officer so offending, in proportion to the seriousness of the charges.

If the charges are denied and the officer demands a hearing within the time above specified, he shall make his demand known to the commissioner in writing. After demand for hearing has been made, the commissioner within twenty (20) days from the date thereof shall arrange for a public hearing before a trial board to be constituted in the manner provided in this section. The officer defendant shall be given not less than twenty (20) days’ notice of the time, place, and hour of the hearing.

Upon the hearing, all charges shall be considered traversed and put in issue, and the trial shall be confined and limited to the issues presented by the written charges. The trial board hearing the charges may summon and compel the attendance of witnesses at all hearings or sittings, by subpoena issued by the commissioner and served upon any witness by any sheriff or other person authorized by law to serve process. If any person fails to comply with any lawful order of the department or with process, or if any witness refuses to testify concerning any matter in which he may lawfully be interrogated, any Circuit Judge, upon application of the trial board, or the commissioner, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify in that court.

The officer defendant shall have the right to subpoena in his behalf any witnesses he may desire, upon furnishing their names to the trial board or to the commissioner. The officer shall likewise have the right to appear in person and by counsel.

All charges against the officer defendant, together with all proceedings before the trial board, shall be transcribed and reduced to writing and a permanent record kept thereof.

In any instance where the commissioner has probable cause to believe that an officer has been guilty of conduct justifying his removal or punishment, he may immediately suspend the officer from duty, or from both pay and duty, pending trial, and the officer shall not be again placed on duty or allowed pay thereafter until a determination of the charges under this section.

The trial board, after hearing the charges, shall fix the punishment of any officer found guilty of any one (1) or more charges, by reprimand or suspension for any length of time not to exceed six (6) months, or by reducing the grade if the officer’s classification warrants same, or by combining any two (2) or more of the punishments, or by reducing the monthly salary of the officer by not more than twenty percent (20%) for not more than six (6) months, or by removing or dismissing from the service of the department any officer so found guilty.

For the purpose of hearing charges against any officer, as set forth in this section, there is created a trial board, which shall consist of the commissioner and of a panel of ten (10) officers of the department appointed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall designate from the panel not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) members thereof to hear charges against any officer in the manner and under the procedure above set forth. The commissioner may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations governing the procedure before the trial board, which do not conflict with this section. The panel or trial board shall be a continuing body, and the officers designated shall serve thereon in addition to their other duties and without any increase in compensation, except they may be reimbursed for meals, lodging, and traveling expenses incurred while in the performance of their official duties as members of the board. Any officer defendant may for cause challenge the right of any member of the board in the trial of any action against him, and if the remaining members of the board find that the challenge is justifiable, the member of the board shall be excused from hearing the charges, and another member substituted in lieu thereof.

No officer is entitled to a hearing as provided in this section, unless his suspension is for more than twenty (20) days, or his pay reduced more than ten percent (10%); but if the officer receives more than twenty (20) days’ suspension or reduction in salary of more than ten percent (10%) within a period of one (1) year, he shall have the right to such hearing in the manner above provided.

Any civilian employee may be discharged, suspended, or reduced in pay at any time by the commissioner, pursuant to KRS Chapter 18A.

Any officer appointed to the department shall be considered on probation for a period of one (1) year from and after the date of his appointment, and during that period may be discharged or suspended or reduced in rank or pay, with or without cause, by the commissioner. The rights conferred upon an officer for a hearing, as provided in this section, shall not accrue until the officer has been employed by the department for a period of one (1) year or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 14; 1952, ch. 57, § 4; 1968, ch. 152, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 1974, ch. 315, § 1; 1980, ch. 114, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 448, § 74, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 318, § 19, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 59, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

16.150.
Appeal from disciplinary action or removal.

Any officer of the department who shall be found guilty by the trial board of any charge as provided in KRS

16.140

shall have the right, within ten (10) days from the date of judgment of the trial board, to appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court, provided the punishment be a suspension of more than twenty (20) days or his pay be reduced more than ten percent (10%), or if he is reduced in grade, if his classification so warrants, or is removed or dismissed from the department; provided, however, the enforcement of the judgment of the trial board upon said charges shall not be suspended during said appeal.

To perfect said appeal within the time specified, such officer shall file in the office of the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court a copy of the order, of all the evidence heard, and of all the steps taken by the trial board relative to such charges, but shall first post a bond to secure the cost of the action in a lump sum to be approved by the circuit clerk, with corporate surety approved by the Department of Insurance as to solvency and responsibility and authorized to transact business in this state, or he may post a cash bond. The members of the trial board and the commissioner shall be necessary parties to such appeal. The circuit clerk shall docket the case as though it were a petition in equity and shall immediately issue a summons for the appellee. The summons shall be returnable in the same manner as in equity cases. Service of summons upon the commissioner or acting commissioner shall be deemed service upon the board.

Such action shall be set down for trial as soon as possible, and the hearing thereof shall be expedited in the same manner as a declaratory judgment suit.

No new or additional evidence shall be introduced in the Franklin Circuit Court, except as to fraud or misconduct of some party engaged in the administration of KRS

16.010

to

16.170

, or one (1) who is a member of the trial board, but the court shall otherwise hear the case upon the record as attested by the board, and in all respects dispose of the appeal in a summary manner. Its review shall be limited to determining whether or not:

The board acted without or in excess of its powers;

The order appealed from was procured by fraud; or

If questions of fact are in issue, whether or not any substantial evidence supports the order appealed from. After such a hearing, the court shall enter a judgment sustaining or setting aside the order of the trial board appealed from. The cost of the action shall follow the judgment of the court.

Any party aggrieved by a judgment of the Franklin Circuit Court may appeal to the Court of Appeals in the manner provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure, but such appeal shall be docketed within sixty (60) days from the entry of judgment, unless the time be extended by the Circuit Court, but in no event beyond one hundred twenty (120) days from the entry of judgment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 14; 1952, ch. 84, § 54; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 1976, ch. 62, § 12; 2010, ch. 24, § 23, effective July 15, 2010.

16.160.
Restrictions on discipline or removal — Reduction of force.

No officer shall be suspended, reduced in rank or pay, or be discharged or dismissed, except as provided in KRS

16.140

and

16.150

, and with the further exception that when insufficient funds require a reduction in expenditures, the officer or officers junior in point of service shall be first discharged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 14.

16.165.
State Police officer disabled on hazardous duty may elect to be retained on payroll — Conditions — Exceptions — Appeal — Disability retirement allowance time may be included in calculation for normal retirement. [See Compiler’s Note below]

Any Department of Kentucky State Police officer, as defined in KRS

16.010

, who becomes disabled after July 1, 1977, as a direct result of an injury or disease arising out of the performance of a hazardous duty in the course of employment with the department may elect to be retained on the regular payroll of the department subject to the following:

For officers who become disabled after July 1, 1977, but prior to July 15, 2016, compensation paid to the officer by the department shall be maintained at the officer’s rate of pay that he or she was receiving on July 15, 2016.

For officers becoming disabled on or after July 15, 2016, compensation paid to the officer by the department shall be maintained at the officer’s regular rate of pay based upon the officer’s rank and tenure with the department on the date he or she elects to be retained on the regular payroll of the department under this section.

On and after July 15, 2016:

Any officer receiving compensation under this section shall not receive any annual increments or increases based on years of service or rank established by the schedules set forth in KRS

16.052

during the period in which the officer receives compensation under this section; and

If the officer returns to full active duty, and the base salary he or she qualifies for at that time exceeds the base salary he or she was receiving under this section, the officer shall receive the base salary he or she qualifies for under the schedules established by KRS

16.052

beginning on the first day of the month following the month that he or she returns to full active duty.

Any compensation paid to an officer by the department under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amount of payments received by the officer from workers’ compensation insurance, Social Security benefits, and other federal or state-financed disability programs designed to supplement the officer’s income for which the officer is qualified and elects participation. Final compensation shall not be reduced by payments for medical care. The disabled officer’s regular rate of pay, without the reductions required by this subsection, shall be his or her creditable compensation for purposes of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

;

The officer shall be assigned by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police to a position in the department for which the officer is qualified, if the commissioner determines, based upon medical reports and recommendations submitted for that purpose, that the officer is able to perform limited duties. If it is determined that the officer is able to perform limited duties and refuses to accept an assignment from the commissioner, the officer shall not be eligible for the payment of compensation authorized by this section. If the commissioner determines that the officer is unable to perform limited duties, the officer shall be eligible for the payment of compensation authorized by this section without the performance of limited duties. Any officer adversely affected or aggrieved by a final determination of the commissioner pursuant to this section may appeal within thirty (30) days to the local Circuit Court;

For an officer whose participation date in the State Police Retirement System is prior to January 1, 2014, payments made pursuant to this section shall continue until the officer is eligible for normal retirement allowances pursuant to KRS

16.576

or until the officer elects early retirement allowances pursuant to KRS

16.577

or disability retirement allowances pursuant to KRS

16.582

.

For an officer whose participation date in the State Police Retirement System is on or after January 1, 2014, payments made pursuant to this section shall continue until the officer is eligible to retire under KRS 16.583(6)(a) or until the officer elects to retire under KRS 16.583(6)(b) or to receive disability retirement allowances pursuant to KRS

16.582

.

If the officer receives preretirement payments under this section or KRS

16.167

and subsequently elects disability retirement, the effective date of his disability retirement shall be the first month following the month in which the officer last receives preretirement payments under this section or KRS

16.167

, KRS 16.505(16) to the contrary notwithstanding; and

Any Department of Kentucky State Police officer, disabled prior to July 1, 1977, as a result of severe physical injuries arising out of the performance of duty, who is unable to maintain gainful employment as a result of such injuries, but who was ineligible for retention on the regular payroll because of the date of his injury, shall, if his or her time in active service plus his or her time on disability retirement allowance equal the time necessary for normal retirement pursuant to KRS 16.505(15), have his or her retirement allowance increased to the amount he or she would receive, had he or she been retained on the regular payroll of the department pursuant to this section and had he or she subsequently elected normal retirement pursuant to KRS

16.576

when first eligible, but any survivor option which he or she chose at the time of disability retirement shall not be changed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 1, effective May 12, 1979; 1986, ch. 257, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 485, § 30, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 65, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 120, § 33, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 110, § 9, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was amended in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 8 and ch. 110, sec. 9. 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 9 has been codified and 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 8 has not.

16.167.
Election of benefits by disabled officer.

Prior to his or her retirement under KRS

16.510

to

16.652

, any Department of Kentucky State Police officer, as defined in KRS

16.010

, who became disabled on or before July 1, 1977, as a result of an injury or disease arising out of the performance of a hazardous duty in the course of his or her employment with the department may elect benefits under KRS

16.165

, if he or she qualifies therefor, or he or she may elect to continue receiving preretirement benefits otherwise available to him or her due to the disability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 2, effective May 12, 1979; 2007, ch. 85, § 66, effective June 26, 2007.

16.170.
Political activity forbidden.

No officer of the department or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall, directly or indirectly, give, solicit or receive, or be in any manner concerned in giving, soliciting or receiving, any assessment, subscription or contribution for any political party or political purpose whatever. No officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall, orally or by letter, solicit or be in any manner concerned in soliciting any assessment, subscription or contribution for any political party or purpose whatever from any person holding a position in the department. No officer of the department or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall take any part in political management or affairs or in political campaigns further than to cast his vote and to express privately his opinion. Violation of the provisions hereof shall be grounds for removal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 80, § 15; 1952, ch. 57, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 2009, ch. 59, § 11, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 15, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If a state policeman desires to run for political office he must terminate his employment and tenure with the Bureau of State Police (now Department of State Police).

OAG 75-713

.

Since this section prohibits an officer of the Bureau of State Police (now Department of State Police) from taking any part in political management or political campaigns, a member of the state police who is on leave of absence is prohibited from seeking election to political office.

OAG 75-713

.

A state police officer while on leave of absence may be employed as a district office manager for a U.S. Senator provided he engages in no political activity while so employed.

OAG 77-444

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Political assessments of state employees forbidden, KRS

121.320

.

State employees not to engage in political activity, KRS

18A.140

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Breckinridge, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, Report to the Committee on the Administration of Justice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Part IX, State Police, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

16.173.
Unit of department to receive and investigate complaints of human trafficking.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall designate a unit within the department to receive and investigate complaints of human trafficking. The unit shall cooperate with and assist prosecutorial agencies and local and federal law enforcement, as well as law enforcement from other states, in the receipt and investigation of complaints of human trafficking.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 25, § 17, effective June 25, 2013.

16.175.
Abduction of children — Kentucky Amber alert system — Department to operate in cooperation with other agencies.

The Department of Kentucky State Police, in cooperation with the Transportation Cabinet, the Division of Emergency Management, the Kentucky Broadcasters Association, and the Kentucky Press Association, shall operate a system to notify the public when a child has been abducted and the department determines that public notification might aid in the recovery of the child. The system shall be known as the Kentucky Amber alert system.

The system shall utilize existing resources, including but not limited to electronic highway signs, the emergency broadcast system, law enforcement communications systems, and local, regional, and statewide media providers.

No public alert using the system shall be issued unless the department, in consultation with the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the abduction of a minor occurred, has determined:

That the minor has actually been abducted or that all available evidence strongly indicates that the minor has been abducted;

That public notification is the most appropriate method of recovering the child in a safe and efficient manner; and

The geographic area in which the notification shall be made.

If it is determined by the department that public notification shall be initiated, the department shall notify the public and private agencies and organizations which will actually provide the notification and shall provide those organizations and agencies with the information which the department deems necessary.

All law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the department in the provision and dissemination of information regarding any abducted minor.

No law enforcement agency, other than the department, shall activate the notification system specified in this section without the authority of the department.

The system shall be operated by all agencies of the Commonwealth within existing budgetary appropriations.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 67, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.